Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-134.02
Local governing bodies; authority under act.

Local governing bodies shall only have authority to approve applications and deny licenses pursuant to the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1989, LB 781, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 183, § 15.